Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.270

Ancillary receiverships.

(1) A receiver appointed in any action pending in the courts of this state, without first seeking approval of the court, may apply to any court outside of this state for appointment as receiver with respect to any property or business of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed constituting estate property which is located in any other jurisdiction, if the appointment is necessary to the receiver's possession, control, management, or disposition of property in accordance with orders of the court.

(2) A receiver appointed by a court of another state, or by a federal court in any district outside of this state, or any other person having an interest in that proceeding, may obtain appointment by a superior court of this state of that same receiver with respect to any property or business of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed constituting property of the foreign receivership that is located in this jurisdiction, if the person is eligible under RCW 7.60.035 to serve as receiver, and if the appointment is necessary to the receiver's possession, control, or disposition of the property in accordance with orders of the court in the foreign proceeding. The superior court upon the receiver's request shall enter the orders, not offensive to the laws and public policy of this state, necessary to effectuate orders entered by the court in the foreign receivership proceeding. A receiver appointed in an ancillary receivership in this state is required to comply with this chapter requiring notice to creditors or other parties in interest only as may be required by the superior court in the ancillary receivership.

[ 2004 c 165 s 29.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.